Utah statutes.
32B-3-306.   Formal objections to renewal.

(1)  The department shall notify governmental entities that in accordance with this part an objecting governmental entity may file with the commission an objection to the renewal of a retail licensee's license in the objecting governmental entity's community.

(2)  The department or an objecting governmental entity may file with the commission a formal objection to a retail license being renewed by the commission if the formal objection:

(a)  is filed on the basis of a nuisance activity;

(b)  is filed no later than 60 days before the expiration date of the retail licensee's license; and

(c)  states with particularity all relevant facts and circumstances relating to the nuisance activity that forms the basis for the formal objection.

